src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-h21_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    plógv+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: plógv
    plógv+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: plógv
    plógv+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: plógvi
    plógv+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: plógs
    plógv+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: plógv
    plógv+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: plógv
    plógv+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: plógvum
    plógv+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: plógva
    plógv+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: plógvið
    plógv+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: plógvið
    plógv+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: plógnum
    plógv+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: plógsins
    plógv+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: plógvini
    plógv+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: plógvini
    plógv+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: plógvunum
    plógv+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: plógvanna
